Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-299
Pen register; trap-and-trace device; application for order.

(1) An investigative or law enforcement officer may make application for an order or an extension of an order under section 86-2,100 authorizing or approving the installation and use of a pen register or a trap-and-trace device under sections 86-298 to 86-2,101 to a county or district court. Such application shall be in writing and shall be under oath or affirmation.

(2) An application under subsection (1) of this section shall include:

(a) The identity of the investigative or law enforcement officer making the application and the identity of the law enforcement agency conducting the investigation; and

(b) A certification by the applicant that the information likely to be obtained is relevant to an ongoing criminal investigation being conducted by that agency.

Laws 1988, LB 899, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-707.04;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 161.